Nebraska, session 109, LB52.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-1850, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1850 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Covered offense means:
(i) Murder in the first degree, pursuant to section 28-303;
(ii) Murder in the second degree, pursuant to section 28-304;
(iii) Manslaughter, section 28-305;
(iv) Motor vehicle homicide, section 28-306;
(v) Assault in the first degree, section 28-308;
(vi) Assault in the second degree, section 28-309;
(vii) Assault by strangulation or suffocation, section 28-310.01;
(viii) Terroristic threats, section 28-311.01;
(ix) Stalking, section 28-311.03;
(x) (iii) Kidnapping, pursuant to section 28-313;
(xi) False imprisonment in the first degree, section 28-314;
(xii) Sexual abuse by a school employee, section 28-316.01;
(iv) Assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-308;
(v) Assault in the second degree pursuant to section 28-309;
(xiii) (vi) Sexual assault in the first degree, pursuant to section
28-319;
(xiv) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree, section 28-319.01;
(xv) (vii) Sexual assault in the second degree, pursuant to section
28-320;
(viii) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to section
28-319.01;
(xvi) (ix) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree,
pursuant to section 28-320.01;
(xvii) Child enticement by means of an electronic communication device,
section 28-320.02;
(xviii) Sexual abuse of a protected individual, section 28-322.04;
(xix) Domestic assault in the first or second degree, section 28-323;
(x) Stalking pursuant to section 28-311.03; or
(xx) Sex trafficking, sex trafficking of a minor, labor trafficking, or
labor trafficking of a minor, section 28-831; or
(xxi) (xi) An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit an offense
listed in this subdivision (1)(a) of this section (a); and
(b) Victim has the same meaning as in section 29-119.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, when a
person is convicted of a felony, the county attorney shall forward the name and
address of any victim of such convicted person to the Board of Parole, the
Department of Correctional Services, the county corrections agency, the
Department of Health and Human Services, and the Board of Pardons, as
applicable.
(b) A victim may waive the right to notification under this section by
notifying the county attorney, in which case the county attorney is not
required to comply with subdivision (2)(a) of this section.
(c) The Board of Parole, the Department of Correctional Services, the
county corrections agency, the Department of Health and Human Services, and the
Board of Pardons shall include the victim's name in the file of the convicted
person, but the name shall not be part of the public record of any parole or
pardons hearings of the convicted person.
(d) Any victim, including a victim who has waived his or her right to
notification, may request the notification prescribed in this section, as
applicable, by sending a written request to the Board of Parole, the Department
of Correctional Services, the county corrections agency, the Department of
Health and Human Services, or the Board of Pardons any time after the convicted
person is incarcerated and until the convicted person is no longer under the
jurisdiction of the Board of Parole, the county corrections agency, the
Department of Correctional Services, or the Board of Pardons or, if the
convicted person is under the jurisdiction of the Department of Health and
Human Services, within the three-year period after the convicted person is no
longer under the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole, the county corrections
agency, the Department of Correctional Services, or the Board of Pardons.
(3) A victim whose name appears in the file of the convicted person shall
be notified by the Board of Parole:
(a) Within ninety days after conviction of an offender, of the tentative
date of release and the earliest parole eligibility date of such offender;
-1-

LB52 LB52
2025 2025
(b) Of any parole hearings or proceedings;
(c) Of any decision of the Board of Parole;
(d) When a convicted person who is on parole is returned to custody
because of parole violations; and
(e) If the convicted person has been adjudged a mentally disordered sex
offender or is a convicted sex offender, when such convicted person is released
from custody or treatment.
Such notification shall be given in person, by telecommunication, or by
mail.
(4) A victim whose name appears in the file of the convicted person shall
be notified by the Department of Correctional Services or a county corrections
agency:
(a) When a convicted person is granted a furlough or release from
incarceration for twenty-four hours or longer or any transfer of the convicted
person to community status;
(b) When a convicted person is released into community-based programs,
including educational release and work release programs. Such notification
shall occur at the beginning and termination of any such program;
(c) When a convicted person escapes or does not return from a granted
furlough or release and again when the convicted person is returned into
custody;
(d) When a convicted person is discharged from custody upon completion of
his or her sentence. Such notice shall be given at least thirty days before
discharge, when practicable;
(e) Of the (i) department's calculation of the earliest parole eligibility
date of the prisoner with all potential good time or disciplinary credits
considered if the sentence exceeds ninety days or (ii) county corrections
agency's calculation of the earliest release date of the prisoner. The victim
may request one notice of the calculation described in this subdivision. Such
information shall be mailed not later than thirty days after receipt of the
request;
(f) Of any reduction in the prisoner's minimum sentence; and
(g) Of the victim's right to submit a statement as provided in section
81-1848.
(5) A victim whose name appears in the file of a convicted person shall be
notified by the Department of Health and Human Services:
(a) When a person described in subsection (6) of this section becomes the
subject of a petition pursuant to the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or
the Sex Offender Commitment Act prior to his or her discharge from custody upon
the completion of his or her sentence or within thirty days after such
discharge. The county attorney who filed the petition shall notify the
Department of Correctional Services of such petition. The Department of
Correctional Services shall forward the names and addresses of victims
appearing in the file of the convicted person to the Department of Health and
Human Services; and
(b) When a person under a mental health board commitment pursuant to
subdivision (a) of this subsection:
(i) Escapes from an inpatient facility providing board-ordered treatment
and again when the person is returned to an inpatient facility;
(ii) Is discharged or has a change in disposition from inpatient board-
ordered treatment;
(iii) Is granted a furlough or release for twenty-four hours or longer;
and
(iv) Is released into educational release programs or work release
programs. Such notification shall occur at the beginning and termination of any
such program.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section applies to a person convicted of a
covered offense which is also alleged to be the recent act or threat underlying
the commitment of such person as mentally ill and dangerous or as a dangerous
sex offender as defined in section 83-174.01.
(7) A victim whose name appears in the file of a person convicted of a
covered offense shall be notified, via certified mail, by the Board of Pardons:
(a) Of any pardon or commutation proceedings at least thirty calendar days
prior to the proceedings; and
(b) If a pardon or commutation has been granted, within ten days after
such granting.
(8) The Board of Parole, the Department of Correctional Services, the
Department of Health and Human Services, and the Board of Pardons shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations as needed to carry out this section.
(9) The victim's address and telephone number maintained by the Department
of Correctional Services, the Department of Health and Human Services, the
county corrections agency, the Board of Parole, and the Board of Pardons
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be exempt from disclosure
under Nebraska public records laws and federal freedom of information laws, as
such federal laws existed on January 1, 2004.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-1850, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-2-